District of Columbia statutes.
10-838

Quarterly report.

The Mayor shall transmit to the Council within 30 days after the end of each quarter a report containing the following information:

(1)

A list of the properties acquired during the quarter to be disposed of pursuant to this subchapter;

(2)

A list of the properties disposed of pursuant to this subchapter during the quarter;

(3)

A copy of each RFP issued during the quarter;

(4)

A copy of each winning proposal selected during the quarter;

(5)

A copy of each disposition agreement entered into during the quarter;

(6)

A cumulative list of each property disposed of pursuant to this subchapter including:

(A)

The status of the rehabilitation of the property;

(B)

Whether the developer has resold or rented the property;

(C)

A list of the properties sold or rented as affordable to households earning 60% or less of area median income, that specifies the percentage of area median income earned by the household; and

(7)

Any other relevant information.

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-267, § 9, 50 DCR 420
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-119, § 3(g), 53 DCR 2609
D.C. Law 16-119 rewrote par. (6), which had read as follows: “(6) A cumulative list of each property disposed of pursuant to this subchapter, the status of the rehabilitation of the property, and whether the developer has resold the property for residential occupancy; and”
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 9 of Abandoned and Vacant Properties Community Development Disposition, and Disapproval of Disposition of Certain Scattered Vacant and Abandoned Properties Temporary of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-203, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10021).